Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.415

Professional learning days—Funding.

(1) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, the legislature shall begin phasing in funding for professional learning days for certificated instructional staff. At a minimum, the state must allocate funding for:

(a) One professional learning day in the 2018-19 school year;

(b) Two professional learning days in the 2019-20 school year; and

(c) Three professional learning days in the 2020-21 school year.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall calculate each school district's professional learning allocation as provided in subsection (1) of this section separate from the minimum state allocation for salaries as specified in RCW 28A.150.410 and associated fringe benefits on the apportionment reports provided to each school district. The professional learning allocation shall be equal to the proportional increase resulting from adding the professional learning days provided in subsection (1) of this section to the required minimum number of school days in RCW 28A.150.220(5)(a) applied to the school district's minimum state allocation for salaries and associated fringe benefits for certificated instructional staff as specified in the omnibus operating appropriations act. Professional learning allocations shall be included in per-pupil calculations, such as special education, for programs funded on a per-pupil basis.

(3) Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.

(4) The professional learning days must meet the definitions and standards provided in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434.

[ 2019 c 387 s 3; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 105.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—2019 c 387: See note following RCW 28A.150.392.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.